Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.695

Identification of new dental prostheses.

Every complete upper and lower denture and removable dental prosthesis fabricated by a dentist licensed under this chapter, or fabricated pursuant to the dentist's work order or under the dentist's direction or supervision, shall be marked with the name of the patient for whom the prosthesis is intended. The markings shall be done during fabrication and shall be permanent, legible, and cosmetically acceptable. The exact location of the markings and the methods used to apply or implant them shall be determined by the dentist or dental laboratory fabricating the prosthesis. If, in the professional judgment of the dentist or dental laboratory, this identification is not practical, identification shall be provided as follows:

(1) The initials of the patient may be shown alone, if use of the name of the patient is impracticable; or

(2) The identification marks may be omitted in their entirety if none of the forms of identification specified in subsection (1) of this section is practicable or clinically safe.

[ 1987 c 252 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.32.322.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 252: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 252 s 5.]